Illinois, session 104th, HB1557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Charitable Trust Stabilization Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 790/15)7    Sec. 15. Grant eligibility. To be eligible to receive a 8grant under this Act, an organization must be a 9community-based organization or other not-for-profit entity 10that:11        (1) is a not-for-profit corporation that is exempt 12    from federal income taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of 13    the federal Internal Revenue Code of 1986;14        (2) is organized under the General Not for Profit 15    Corporation Act of 1986 for the purpose of providing 16    charitable services to the community; and17        (3) complies with the provisions of the Charitable 18    Trust Act; .19        (4) has a staff or board that is completely voluntary 20    or has the equivalent of not more than one full-time paid 21    employee; and 22        (5) has adopted a policy of non-discrimination on the 23    basis of race, gender, sexual orientation, age, national   HB1557- 2 -LRB104 03546 JRC 13569 b1    origin, disability, family status, or religion. 2(Source: P.A. 95-655, eff. 6-1-08.)